Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.020

Liability for debts and judgments.

Every school district shall be liable for any debts legally due, and for judgments against the district, and such district shall pay any such judgment or liability out of the proper school funds to the credit of the district.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.020. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 287 s 4; RRS s 4779; prior: 1897 c 118 s 41; 1890 p 365 s 27. Formerly RCW 28A.58.020, 28.58.020.]